New York, session 2025-2026, S4567.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 268-c of the public health law is amended by adding 2 a new subdivision 27 to read as follows: 3 27. Ascertain if a Marketplace applicant is eligible for health care 4 through the United States department of veterans affairs and, if eligi- 5 ble for such health care, provide the Marketplace applicant with 6 resources to allow them to apply for health care benefits through the 7 United States department of veterans affairs. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 9 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 10 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 11 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 12 on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08674-01-5